District of Columbia statutes.
47-4644

Thirteenth Church of Christ real property tax relief.

[Not funded].

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-292, § 2(b), 57 DCR 11510

Section 4 of D.C. Law 18-292 provided: “Sec. 4. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of Law 18-292 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by Law 18-292, are not in effect.